Massachusetts, session 194th, S129.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 51A of Chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking out subsection (k) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
(k) A mandated reporter who is professionally licensed by the commonwealth shall
complete training at least every two years to recognize and report suspected child abuse or
neglect. The training shall have a curriculum that has been approved by the Office of the Child
Advocate.
SECTION 2. Section 5 of Chapter 18C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding
the following subsection:-
(i) The child advocate shall be responsible for approving curricula for mandated reporter
trainings in accordance with M.G.L. c. 119 § 51A(k). Such curricula shall include, but not be
limited to, recognition of the signs of child neglect or abuse and related reporting requirements,
of 2

bias and cultural considerations in reporting, information on how to address concerns with
families and children when those concerns do not rise to the level of requiring a maltreatment
report, information about connecting families with needed supports and resources and how to
understand what qualifies as neglect.
of 2